Utah statutes.
31A-5-413.   Interlocking directorates and other relationships.
Any person who is simultaneously an officer or director of more than one
insurer shall, upon the commissioner's request, disclose all conflicts of
interest arising from holding those positions simultaneously.  This disclosure
shall be given to the directors of the insurers and to the commissioner within
15 working days after receipt of the commissioner's request.
